Idaho, session 2026, H0554.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-2804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2804. POWERS AND DUTIES OF ABATEMENT DISTRICTS. (1) The abatement
district board of trustees is authorized:
(1) (a) To appoint a director to direct the activities of the district,
in accordance with training and experience necessary to fulfill the du-
ties of the position.;
(2) (b) To appoint such other persons as necessary, determine their du-
ties and compensation, and make rules and regulations respecting them.;
(3) To take all necessary and proper steps for the control of mosquitoes
and other vermin of public health and welfare importance in the district and
for these purposes shall have the right to enter upon any and all lands.
(4) (c) To sue and be sued.;
(5) (d) To contract to purchase, hold, dispose of, and acquire by gift
real and personal property in the name of the district. To exercise the
right of eminent domain and for these purposes to condemn any necessary
land or rights-of-way in accordance with general law.;
(6) (e) To abate as nuisance breeding places of mosquitoes or other
vermin of public health and welfare importance within the district or
within migrating distance of the district by use of chemicals or per-
manent control measures and in this connection have the right to enter
upon any and all lands.;
(7) (f) To work with the lateral ditch water users associations, ir-
rigation, drainage and flood control districts and other cooperating
organizations. The board of trustees of the abatement district may
supplement funds of cooperating organizations for improvement, repair,
maintenance, and cleaning of ditches which that will temporarily or
permanently eliminate mosquito breeding or for other activities which
that will benefit the district.;
(8) (g) To file annually with the board of county commissioners for
their approval an estimate of funds required for the next year, a plan


of the work to be done, and methods to be employed. No procedure, work,
or contract for any year of operation shall be done or entered upon into
until plans and budget have been jointly approved by the board of county
commissioners.;
(9) (h) To file, annually or by February 1 of the succeeding year, with
the board of county commissioners a report setting forth the moneys ex-
pended during the previous year, methods employed, and work accomplish-
ments.; and
(10) To approve a written mosquito or other vermin management plan
submitted by a landowner requesting that their property be excluded from
treatment by the abatement district. Such plan must be specific to the
landowner's property, provide adequate control measures, and be implemented
by the landowner. The abatement district shall refrain from treatment of
property included in the approved plan, but shall maintain monitoring and
surveillance activities. If the landowner fails to follow the plan or does
not provide adequate control measures, the abatement district may abate the
mosquitoes or other vermin.
(11) (i) To cooperate with other entities. At its discretion, a dis-
trict may cooperate with and enter into annual agreements or contract
with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the
federal government, private associations, and private individuals in
order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.
(2) The abatement district board of trustees shall obtain written
permission annually from a landowner before entering or flying above the
landowner's property to conduct abatement-related activities, including
treating the property aerially or by ground and monitoring and surveilling
the property, regardless of whether an emergency has been declared pursuant
to section 39-2812, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-2812, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2812. PESTS -- PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE -- DISASTERS -- EMERGEN-
CIES -- INTERIM ABATEMENT DISTRICTS. (1) To provide for the timely response
to an elevated or anticipated pest population that may constitute a risk
to public health and welfare, the board of county commissioners of each
county of this state, in collaboration with duly recognized local and state
officials, and after a public hearing is called for such purpose as a spe-
cial meeting pursuant to the provisions of section 74-204(2), Idaho Code,
is hereby granted full power and authority to declare such pests as public
health and welfare pests, and to initiate activities to hinder in the poten-
tial spread of disease, or adverse economic impact, caused by these pests by
taking appropriate steps to intervene in the natural biological cycle of the
pests or disease.
(2) Boards of county commissioners are further authorized and empow-
ered, in the event of a disaster or emergency declared by such boards, to
make direct appropriations for the purpose of controlling public health and
welfare pests as declared pursuant to this section. All moneys raised by
direct appropriation shall be placed in a county public health and welfare
pest fund, which shall be used exclusively for the control of pests of public
health and welfare significance and for payment of all necessary expenses


incurred in such control program. In addition, the county may impose an an-
nual property tax assessment pursuant to section 39-2805, Idaho Code, and
in accordance with the provisions of sections 63-802 and 63-803, Idaho Code,
for the term of the disaster or emergency or until all expenses incurred dur-
ing the disaster or emergency have been recovered. Such fund shall be a re-
volving fund and all moneys returned to the fund under any of the provisions
of this chapter shall continue to be available for the operation of the con-
trol program.
(3) The disaster or emergency declaration of a pest of public health
and welfare significance within a county and subsequent pest management
activity shall, except as provided herein, place the whole county into an
interim abatement district for administrative purposes for no more than two
(2) years. The transition of an interim abatement district into a formally
defined abatement district, shall be brought to a vote of the electorate
within twenty-four (24) months of the declaration, subject to the notifica-
tion and establishment requirements provided in this chapter, and conducted
during a general election held on the first Tuesday following the first Mon-
day in November of even-numbered years, and if passed, the district shall be
recognized and the provisions of this chapter shall be implemented. If the
measure fails, the balance of revolving fund moneys shall be distributed as
required by state law. In the event the disaster or emergency exceeds the
county's capacity or resources, provisions should be made to request state
or federal disaster or emergency funds to address the evolving situation.
If the interim abatement district provides the same service as an existing
abatement district, the interim abatement district shall exclude any area
within an existing abatement district.
(4) Aerial abatement methods shall be used within an abatement district
only when the respective board of county commissioners has declared an emer-
gency. In such cases, aerial abatement methods shall be used only to treat
property within the abatement district that has not been exempted pursuant
to section 39-2814, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 28, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-2814, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
39-2814. PARTICIPATION IN ABATEMENT DISTRICTS BY PROPERTY OWNERS. (1)
An individual who owns property within an abatement district may submit a
written notice that includes the physical address of the property to the
board of county commissioners for the county in which the property is located
requesting that the property be exempted from any and all abatement-related
activities. The notice shall remain in effect until the owner of the prop-
erty rescinds the notice in writing.
(2) Upon receiving such written request, the board of county commis-
sioners shall notify every abatement district within the state of Idaho that
the property is exempted from abatement-related activities, and the dis-
tricts and county shall strictly adhere to the requested exemption.
(3)(a) In the event that abatement related-activities occurs on, over,
or above an exempted property, the owner may:
(i) Submit evidence of the violation to the respective board of
county commissioners; and


(ii) Initiate a civil action against the respective board of
county commissioners and abatement district.
(b) If a court determines a violation occurred:
(i) The board of county commissioners shall be subject to a five
thousand dollar ($5,000) fine for each violation, which shall be
paid to the aggrieved owner; and
(ii) The court shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to
the prevailing party.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-2814, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2814 39-2815. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this chapter are
hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this chapter or the
application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared in-
valid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the
remaining portions of this chapter.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.